hy_AM.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY անմիողտեըցկչյԱՆՄԻՈՂՏԵԸՑԿՉՅ
FLAG long
NEEDAFFIX 00
WORDCHARS '՛՜՞
IGNORE ՛՜՞
FORBIDDENWORD XX


PFX GU Y 1
PFX GU	0	կ/VA .
  

PFX CH Y 1
PFX CH   0     չ/VA           .

SFX DE Y 6
SFX DE   0       ս	.          
SFX DE   0       դ	.
SFX DE 	0	ը	.	
SFX DE	եւ	եւը	.	          
SFX DE 	0	ը	[^աեէիու]
SFX DE   0      ն           .

# հայը
SFX DY Y 4
SFX DY յ	յն	.
SFX DY յ	յս	.
SFX DY յ	յդ	.
SFX DY յ	յը	.

# polysyllabics
SFX PP Y 1
SFX PP   0     ներ/DEABGEINLO	.


#vowelreduction plurals
SFX PX Y 56
SFX PX	իկ	կեր/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX  ուկ     կներ/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX  ումբ	մբեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ունդ	նդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ուզ	զեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ուրդ	րդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  իզբ	զբներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX   ուն     ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX   իթ     թեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ուղթ	ղթեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իծ	ծեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուծ	ծեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուխ	խեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունկ	նկեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունձ	նձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրձ	րձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինձ	նձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իղ	ղեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իճ	ճեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ին	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուն	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշ		շեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուշ		շեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինչ		նչեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունչ		նչեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինջ		նջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունջ		նջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իսպ		սպեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իս		սեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրջ		րջեր/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX իչ		չեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իջ		ջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իռ		ռեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուռ		ռեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուռ		ռներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իտ		տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուտ		տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իվ		վեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իր		րեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իր		րներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուր		րեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշտ		շտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշտ		տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուշտ		շտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իրտ		րտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրտ		րտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ից		ցեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուց		ցեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իտք		տքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուտք		տքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իրք		րքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինք		նքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինդ		նդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուփ		փեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուք		քեր/DEABGEINLO . 
SFX PX դուռ		դռներ/DEABGEINLO . 


# monosyllabic
SFX PM Y 1
SFX PM   0     եր/DEABGEINLO          .

# collectives
SFX PZ Y 4
SFX PZ 0	ենք/DE .
SFX PZ 0	ենց/DE .
SFX PZ ա	այենք/DE .
SFX PZ ա	այենց/DE .

  # ablative 
SFX AB Y 5
SFX AB 	0	ից	.
SFX AB 	0	իցս	.
SFX AB 	0	իցդ	.
SFX AB 	0	իցը	.
SFX AB	0	իցն	.

# ablative  իկ-կից
SFX AX Y 55
SFX AX  իկ	կից/DE .
SFX AX  ուկ	կից/DE .
SFX AX  ումբ		մբից/DE .
SFX AX  ունդ		նդից/DE .
SFX AX  ուրդ	րդից/DE .
SFX AX  իզբ	զբից/DE .
SFX AX  իթ		թից/DE .
SFX AX  ուզ	զից/DE  .
SFX AX  ուղթ	ղթից/DE  .
SFX AX իժ		ժից/DE  .
SFX AX իծ		ծից/DE .
SFX AX ուծ		ծից/DE .
SFX AX ուխ		խից/DE  .
SFX AX ունկ		նկից/DE . 
SFX AX ունձ		նձից/DE .
SFX AX ուրձ		րձից/DE .
SFX AX ինձ		նձից/DE .
SFX AX իղ		ղից/DE .
SFX AX իճ		ճից/DE .
SFX AX ին		նից/DE .
SFX AX ուն		նից/DE .
SFX AX իշ		շից/DE .
SFX AX ուշ		շից/DE .
SFX AX ինչ		նչից/DE .
SFX AX ունչ		նչից/DE .
SFX AX ինջ		նջից/DE .
SFX AX ունջ		նջից/DE .
SFX AX իսպ		սպից/DE .
SFX AX իս		սից/DE .
SFX AX ուրջ		րջից/DE  .
SFX AX իչ		չից/DE .
SFX AX իջ		ջից/DE .
SFX AX իռ		ռից/DE .
SFX AX ուռ		ռից/DE .
SFX AX իտ		տից/DE .
SFX AX ուտ		տից/DE .
SFX AX իվ		վից/DE .
SFX AX իր		րից/DE .
SFX AX ուր		րից/DE .
SFX AX իշտ		շտից/DE .
SFX AX իստ		ստից/DE .
SFX AX ուշտ		շտից/DE .
SFX AX իրտ		րտից/DE .
SFX AX ուրտ		րտից/DE .
SFX AX ից		ցից/DE .
SFX AX ուց		ցից/DE .
SFX AX իտք		տքից/DE .
SFX AX ուտք		տքից/DE .
SFX AX իրք		րքից/DE .
SFX AX ինք		նքից/DE .
SFX AX ինդ		նդից/DE .
SFX AX ուփ		փից/DE .
SFX AX ուք		քից/DE . 
SFX AX եջ		իջից/DE .
SFX AX դուռ		դռնից/DE .


# ablative վանից
SFX AA Y 5
SFX AA 	0	վանից	.
SFX AA 	0	վանիցս	.
SFX AA 	0	վանիցդ	.
SFX AA 	0	վանիցը	.
SFX AA	0	վանիցն	.

# ablative  շաբթի
#SFX AC Y 5
#SFX AC 	ի	վանից	.
#SFX AC 	ի	վանիցս	.
#SFX AC 	ի	վանիցդ	.
#SFX AC 	ի	վանիցը	.
#SFX AC		ի	վանիցն	.

# ablative  ուց  ձիուց  եկեղեցուց
SFX A2 Y 6
SFX A2 	0	ուց	.
SFX A2 	ի	ուց/DE	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցս	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցդ	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցն	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցը	.

# ayits, oyits
SFX A4 Y 2
SFX A4  ա	այից/DE	.
SFX A4  ո	ոյից/DE	.


# genitive
SFX GE Y 6
SFX GE	0	ի	.
SFX GE	0	իս	.
SFX GE 	0	իդ	.
SFX GE 	0	ին       .
SFX GE  իկ	կի/DE	.
SFX GE  ու	վի/DE	.

# ձիու
SFX G2 Y 5
SFX G2	0	ու	.
SFX G2	0	ուս	.
SFX G2	0	ուդ	.
SFX G2	0	ուն	.
SFX G2	ի	ու/DE	.

# միության, արյան
SFX G1 Y 2
SFX G1   յուն	յան/DE           .
SFX G1	0	յան/DE		.

# ayi, oyi
SFX G4 Y 2
SFX G4  ա	այի/DE	.
SFX G4  ո	ոյի/DE	.

# օր
SFX G7 Y 3
SFX G7   այր	որ/DEABINLO           .
SFX G7   եր	որ/DEABINLO           .
SFX G7 	ուստր	ստեր/DE   .


# ոջ
SFX G8 	Y 5
SFX G8  0	ոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8 ույր	րոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	եր	իրոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	ին	նոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8  ուր	րոջ/DEABINLO .

# ման
SFX G9 	Y 1
SFX G9  ում	ման/DE	.	

# վա
SFX GA Y 4
SFX GA	0	վա	.
SFX GA	0	վաս	.
SFX GA	0	վադ	.
SFX GA	0	վան/ABINLO	.

# վա  շաբթի
SFX GC Y 4
SFX GC	ի	վա	.
SFX GC	ի	վաս	.
SFX GC	ի	վադ	.
SFX GC	ի	վան/ABINLO	.

# ան  լեռան
SFX GD Y 3
SFX GD	0	ան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուն	ան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուկ	կան/DE	.

#Gen.sg. vowel reductions
SFX GX  Y   56 
SFX GX  իկ	կի/DE
SFX GX  ուկ	կի/DE
SFX GX  ումբ		մբի/DE
SFX GX  ունդ		նդի/DE
SFX GX  ուրդ	րդի/DE
SFX GX  իզբ	զբի/DE
SFX GX  իթ		թի/DE
SFX GX  ուզ	զի/DE  .
SFX GX  ուղթ	ղթի/DE  .
SFX GX իժ		ժի/DE  .
SFX GX իծ		ծի/DE .
SFX GX ուծ		ծի/DE .
SFX GX ուխ		խի/DE  .
SFX GX ունկ		նկի/DE . 
SFX GX ունձ		նձի/DE .
SFX GX ուրձ		րձի/DE .
SFX GX ինձ		նձի/DE .
SFX GX իղ		ղի/DE .
SFX GX իճ		ճի/DE .
SFX GX ին		նի/DE .
SFX GX ուն		նի/DE .
SFX GX իշ		շի/DE .
SFX GX ուշ		շի/DE .
SFX GX ինչ		նչի/DE .
SFX GX ունչ		նչի/DE .
SFX GX ինջ		նջի/DE .
SFX GX ունջ		նջի/DE .
SFX GX իսպ		սպի/DE .
SFX GX իս		սի/DE .
SFX GX ուրջ		րջի/DE  .
SFX GX իչ		չի/DE .
SFX GX իջ		ջի/DE .
SFX GX իռ		ռի/DE .
SFX GX ուռ		ռի/DE .
SFX GX իտ		տի/DE .
SFX GX ուտ		տի/DE .
SFX GX իվ		վի/DE .
SFX GX իր		րի/DE .
SFX GX ուր		րի/DE .
SFX GX իշտ		շտի/DE .
SFX GX իստ		ստի/DE .
SFX GX ուշտ		շտի/DE .
SFX GX իրտ		րտի/DE .
SFX GX ուրտ		րտի/DE .
SFX GX ից		ցի/DE .
SFX GX ուց		ցի/DE .
SFX GX իտք		տքի/DE .
SFX GX ուտք		տքի/DE .
SFX GX իրք		րքի/DE .
SFX GX ինք		նքի/DE .
SFX GX ինդ		նդի/DE .
SFX GX ուփ		փի/DE .
SFX GX ուք		քի/DE . 
SFX GX եջ		իջի/DE . 
SFX GX դուռ		դռան/DE .
SFX GX ուռ		ռան/DE .

# instrumental
SFX IN Y 5
SFX IN   0     ով/DE          .
SFX IN   0     ովս          .
SFX IN   0     ովդ          .
SFX IN   0     ովն          .
SFX IN   0     ովը          .

# instrumental իկ-կով
SFX Ik Y 1
SFX Ik	իկ	կով/DE	.

# միությամբ, արյամբ
SFX I1 Y 1
SFX I1   յուն	յամբ/DE          .

# լուծմամբ
SFX I3 Y 1
SFX I3	ում	մամբ/DE	.

# եկեղեցով
SFX I2 Y 1
SFX I2	ի	ով/DE	.

# ayi, oyi
SFX I4 Y 2
SFX I4  ա	այով/DE	.
SFX I4  ո	ոյով/DE	.


# instrumental with vowel reduction
SFX IX Y 55
SFX IX  իկ	կով/DE .
SFX IX  ուկ	կով/DE .
SFX IX  ումբ		մբով/DE .
SFX IX  ունդ		նդով/DE .
SFX IX  ուրդ	րդով/DE .
SFX IX  իզբ	զբով/DE .
SFX IX  իթ		թով/DE .
SFX IX  ուզ	զով/DE  .
SFX IX  ուղթ	ղթով/DE  .
SFX IX իժ		ժով/DE  .
SFX IX իծ		ծով/DE .
SFX IX ուծ		ծով/DE .
SFX IX ուխ		խով/DE  .
SFX IX ունկ		նկով/DE . 
SFX IX ունձ		նձով/DE .
SFX IX ուրձ		րձով/DE .
SFX IX ինձ		նձով/DE .
SFX IX իղ		ղով/DE .
SFX IX իճ		ճով/DE .
SFX IX ին		նով/DE .
SFX IX ուն		նով/DE .
SFX IX իշ		շով/DE .
SFX IX ուշ		շով/DE .
SFX IX ինչ		նչով/DE .
SFX IX ունչ		նչով/DE .
SFX IX ինջ		նջով/DE .
SFX IX ունջ		նջով/DE .
SFX IX իսպ		սպով/DE .
SFX IX իս		սով/DE .
SFX IX ուրջ		րջով/DE  .
SFX IX իչ		չով/DE .
SFX IX իջ		ջով/DE .
SFX IX իռ		ռով/DE .
SFX IX ուռ		ռով/DE .
SFX IX իտ		տով/DE .
SFX IX ուտ		տով/DE .
SFX IX իվ		վով/DE .
SFX IX իր		րով/DE .
SFX IX ուր		րով/DE .
SFX IX իշտ		շտով/DE .
SFX IX իստ		ստով/DE .
SFX IX ուշտ		շտով/DE .
SFX IX իրտ		րտով/DE .
SFX IX ուրտ		րտով/DE .
SFX IX ից		ցով/DE .
SFX IX ուց		ցով/DE .
SFX IX իտք		տքով/DE .
SFX IX ուտք		տքով/DE .
SFX IX իրք		րքով/DE .
SFX IX ինք		նքով/DE .
SFX IX ինդ		նդով/DE .
SFX IX ուփ		փով/DE .
SFX IX ուք		քով/DE .
SFX IX եջ		իջով/DE .
SFX IX դուռ		դռնով/DE  . 

 
